vi: Thiết kế dao thủ công: Chính xác; Cứa vào; Tóc thẳng; Lốp xoay; Khác
nb: Hobbyknivblad: Presisjon; Avbrekkbar; Rett; Svingbar; Annet
fr: Conception de couteau artisanal: Pointe de précision; Cutters; Lisses; Pivot; Autre
ko: 공예용 칼 디자인: 정도; 잘라 쓰는 칼날; 일자형; 스위블; 기타
el: Σχέδιο μαχαιριών χειροτεχνίας: Ακριβείας; Αποσπώμενη; Ευθεία; Περιστροφή; Άλλο
sv: Hobbyknivsutförande: Precision; Snäpp-av; Rakt; Snurra; Övrigt
es: Diseño de cúter para manualidades: Precisión; Desprendible; Liso; Giratorio; Otros
de: Bastelmesser-Design: Präzision; Snap-off; Glatt; Wirbel; Sonstiges
nl: Ontwerp ambachtelijk mes: Precisie; Afklikbaar; Steil; Draaibaar; Andere
pl: Projekt noża rzemieślniczego: Precyzja; Odłączane; Prosta; Rotacja; Inne
it: Design del taglierino: Precisione; A sgancio; Dritto; Girevole; Altro
cs: Design řemeslného nože: Přesná; Odlamovací; Rovné; Otočná; Jiné
sl-SI: Zasnova noža za ustvarjanje: Natančnost; Olfa; Ravno; Vrtljiv; Drugo
sk-SK: Dizajn remeselného noža: Presnosť; Odlamovací; Rovný; Otočný; Iné
fi: Askarteluveitsen muotoilu: Tarkasti levittyvä; Irti napsautettava; Suorat; Kääntyvä; Muu
ro-RO: Design cutter artizanat: Precizie; Segmentat; Drept; Pivotant; Altele
lt-LT: Rankdarbių peilio dizainas: Smulkus; Užspaudžiamas; Tiesus; Sukamas; Kita
hr-HR: Dizajn noža za rukotvorine: Precizni; Za otkidanje; Ravni; Zakretni; Ostalo
bg-BG: Дизайн на занаятчийски нож: Прецизност; Макетен; Прав; Въртящ се; Други
pt-BR: Formato da faca artesanal: Precisão; Removíveis; Liso; Giratório; Outro
pt-PT: Design de faca para trabalhos manuais: Precisão; Retrátil; Liso; Torniquete; Outro
hu: Kézműves kés kialakítása: Precíziós; Rápattintható; Egyenes; Forgatható; Egyéb
zh-CN: 手工刀设计: 精准; 美工刀片; 直; 旋转式; 其他
da: Hobbyknivdesign: Præcision; Snap-off; Lige; Drejelig; Andet
ru: Конструкция макетного ножа: Точность; Отрывной; Прямой; Поворотный; Другое
en: Craft knife design: Precision; Snap-off; Straight; Swivel; Other
tr: Zanaat bıçağı tasarımı: Kesinlik; Koparma; Düz; Tablalı; Diğer
th: การออกแบบมีดงานฝีมือ: ปัดขนตาได้อย่างแม่นยำ; หักทิ้งได้; ผมตรง; ล้อเลื่อน; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 工藝刀設計: 精密; 摺疊式; 直; 萬向型; 其他
ja: クラフトナイフの種類: プレシジョン; スナップオフ; ストレート; スイベル; その他